Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3341
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 43-3341 to 43-3347:

(1) Business day means a day on which state offices are open for regular business;

(2) Child support has the same meaning as found in section 43-1705;

(3) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(4) Medical support has the same meaning as found in section 43-512;

(5) Obligee means a person to whom a duty of support is owed pursuant to a support order;

(6) Obligor means a person who owes a duty of support pursuant to a support order;

(7) Normal business hours means 7 a.m. to 6 p.m. Central Time;

(8) Spousal support has the same meaning as found in section 43-1715;

(9) State Disbursement Unit means the unit established in section 43-3342;

(10) Support has the same meaning as found in section 43-3313;

(11) Support order has the same meaning as found in section 43-1717; and

(12) Title IV-D Division means the Title IV-D Division of the department which is the single organizational unit of the state that has the responsibility for administering or supervising the administration of the state plan under Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act.

Laws 1999, LB 637, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 972, § 28.